Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 7

Regulation of Transfer and Storage Businesses

6-54-701. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Governing body” means the official or officials authorized by law to exercise ordinance or other law-making power of a municipality;

“Local transfer and storage business” means the business of transferring and/or storing for a profit the household goods and effects of another within the confines of the territorial limits of the municipality adopting this part;

“Municipality” means any incorporated city or incorporated town of this state, with a population in excess of four hundred thousand (400,000), according to the federal census of 1960 or any subsequent federal census;

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, joint stock association, trustee, receiver or assignee; and

“Transfer and storage regulatory board” means any regulatory board created pursuant to § 6-54-702.

Acts 1963, ch. 323, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-634.

6-54-702. Creation of regulatory board.

Any municipality may, by ordinance, or by resolution, create a transfer and storage regulatory board, which shall be authorized to exercise its functions upon the appointment and qualification of the first members of such board.

Upon adoption of an ordinance or resolution, whichever is applicable, creating a transfer and storage regulatory board, the governing body shall, pursuant to the ordinance or resolution, appoint five (5) persons as members of the board.

The members who are first appointed shall be designated to serve for terms of one (1), two (2), three (3), four (4) and five (5) years respectively, but thereafter each member shall be appointed for a term of five (5) years, except that vacancies occurring otherwise than by the expiration of the terms shall be filled for the unexpired term by the governing body in the same manner as the original appointments.

Acts 1963, ch. 323, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-635.

6-54-703. Organization of board — Rules and regulations.

Immediately upon appointment, the members of the regulatory board shall select from among the members a chair and a secretary of the board and, as soon thereafter as is feasible, the board shall submit to the governing body a set of rules and regulations that it deems necessary and desirable for the protection of the citizens of the municipality, to prevent irresponsible persons from engaging in the business and to avoid the likelihood of fraud and injustice being wrought upon the citizenry.

Acts 1963, ch. 323, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-636.

6-54-704. Adoption and enforcement of regulations.

The governing body may then adopt or reject the recommendations of the board by ordinance or resolution or make such modifications as it deems proper.

When proper regulations, satisfactory to the board and governing body, have been established, the governing body shall empower the board to regulate and enforce the regulations, adopting in the regulations such penal provisions as it deems necessary to ensure the powers in the board to enforce the regulations, and granting to persons feeling aggrieved by the enforcement of the regulations such appellate procedural rights as it deems proper.

Acts 1963, ch. 323, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-637.

6-54-705. Compensation — Supplies and secretarial help — Fees.

The members of the regulatory board shall serve without compensation; provided, that the governing body may expend such sums of money as it deems necessary to provide secretarial help and office supplies to the board as might be required, and may by ordinance or resolution levy a nominal charge upon those parties engaged in the local transfer and storage business as may be necessary to defray the expense thereof.

Acts 1963, ch. 323, § 5; T.C.A., § 6-638.